Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Part 1
General Provisions

§ 26-31-101. Short title and scope.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Residential Mortgage Practices Act,” and is organized into three (3) parts. Part 1 includes provisions that apply to the entire chapter. Part 2 includes provisions for the regulation of mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders. Part 3 includes provisions for the regulation of individual mortgage loan originators.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-101, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-102. General definitions.

As used in this chapter and in rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter:

“Borrower” means the person who has applied for a residential mortgage loan from a licensee, or person required to be licensed, under this chapter, or on whose behalf the activities set forth in section 26-31-201(3), (5) or (7) or 26-31-303(7), Idaho Code, are conducted. “Borrower” does not include an organization that, as part of a regular business of constructing or rehabilitating dwellings, makes application for a residential mortgage loan to finance the construction or rehabilitation of a dwelling.

“Control person” means a person who:

Has the power, directly or indirectly, to direct the management or policies of a company, including a managing member, general partner, director, executive officer, or other person occupying a similar position or performing similar functions or, in the case of a limited liability company, is a managing member;

Directly or indirectly has the right to vote ten percent (10%) or more of a class of a voting security of a mortgage broker or mortgage lender; or

Is an individual identified as a manager of a location for which an applicant is applying for a license under part 2 of this chapter.

“Deficiency” means information contained in, or omitted from, an application for a mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage loan originator license that causes the application to be inaccurate, incomplete, or otherwise not in conformance with the provisions of this chapter, any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter, application instructions published by the director or the provisions of the NMLSR policy guidebook.

“Department” means the department of finance of the state of Idaho.

“Director” means the director of the department of finance.

“Financial services” means any activity pertaining to securities, commodities, banking, insurance, consumer lending, money services businesses, consumer debt management, or real estate including, but not limited to, acting as or being associated with a bank or savings association, credit union, farm credit system institution, mortgage lender, mortgage broker, real estate salesperson or agent, appraiser, closing agent, title company, escrow agent, payday lender, money transmitter, check casher, pawnbroker, collection agent, debt management company, title lender, or credit repair organization.

“Housing finance agency” means any entity that is:

Chartered by a state to help meet the affordable housing needs of the residents of the state;

Supervised, directly or indirectly, by the state government; and

Subject to audit and review by the state in which it operates.

“Licensee” means a person licensed pursuant to this chapter to engage in the activities regulated by this chapter.

“Nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry” or “NMLSR” means a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the conference of state bank supervisors and the American association of residential mortgage regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage brokers, mortgage lenders, and mortgage loan originators.

“NMLSR policy guidebook” means the conference of state bank supervisor’s and the American association of residential mortgage regulator’s NMLSR policy guidebook for licensees, published by the NMLSR, as identified by administrative rule.
(11) “Organization” means a person that is not a natural person.

(12) “Person” means a natural person, corporation, company, limited liability company, partnership or association.

(13) “Real estate settlement procedures act” means the act set forth in 12 U.S.C. 2601 et seq., as identified by administrative rule.

(14) “Regulation X” means regulation X as issued by the federal bureau of consumer protection and codified at 12 CFR 1024 et seq., as identified by administrative rule.

(15) “Regulation Z” means regulation Z as issued by the federal bureau of consumer protection and codified at 12 CFR 1026 et seq., as identified by administrative rule.

(16) “Residential mortgage loan” means any loan that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling, as defined in section 103(w) of the truth in lending act, located in Idaho, or on residential real estate.

(17) “Residential real estate” means any real property located in Idaho upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling as defined in section 103(w) of the truth in lending act.

(18) “Truth in lending act” means the act set forth in 15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq., as identified by administrative rule.

(19) “Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the NMLSR.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-102, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 1, p. 142; am. 2015, ch. 244, § 10, p. 1008; am. 2020, ch. 100, § 3, p. 260.

§ 26-31-103. Director’s authority under the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

The legislature has determined that a nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry for mortgage brokers, mortgage lenders and mortgage loan originators is consistent with both the public interest and the purposes of this chapter.

For the sole purpose of participating in the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry, the director is authorized to:

Modify by rule the license renewal dates under this chapter;

Establish by rule such new requirements as are necessary for the state of Idaho to participate in the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry upon the director’s finding that each new requirement is consistent with both the public interest and the purposes of this chapter; and

Require a background investigation of each applicant and each control person of an applicant for a mortgage broker, mortgage lender or mortgage loan originator license by means of fingerprint checks by the Idaho state police and the FBI for state and national criminal history record checks. The information obtained thereby may be used by the director to determine the applicant’s eligibility for licensing under this chapter. The fee required to perform the criminal history record check shall be borne by the license applicant. Information obtained or held by the director pursuant to this subsection shall be considered confidential personal information and shall be exempt from disclosure pursuant to section 74-106(8) and (9), Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-103, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 2, p. 142; am. 2015, ch. 141, § 46, p. 379.

§ 26-31-104. Borrower’s remedies not affected.

The grant of powers to the director in this chapter does not limit remedies available to borrowers under this chapter or under other principles of law or equity.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-104, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-105. Relationship to other laws.

All political subdivisions of this state shall be prohibited from enacting and enforcing ordinances, resolutions, regulations and rules pertaining to the financial or lending activities of persons who:

Are subject to the jurisdiction of the department, including those whose activities are subject to this chapter;

Are subject to the jurisdiction or regulatory supervision of the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the office of the comptroller of the currency, the national credit union administration, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the federal trade commission or the United States department of housing and urban development; or

Originate, purchase, sell, assign, securitize or service property interests or obligations created by financial transactions or loans made, executed or originated by persons referred to in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection or who assist or facilitate such transactions.

The requirements of this section shall apply to all ordinances, resolutions and rules pertaining to financial or lending activities, including any ordinances, resolutions or rules disqualifying persons from doing business with a political subdivision based upon financial or lending activities or imposing reporting requirements or any other obligations upon persons regarding financial or lending activities.

In the event that the United States department of housing and urban development, pursuant to the authority granted to it under section 1508, P.L. 110-289, determines that a provision of this chapter does not meet the requirements of section 1508, P.L. 110-289, the director may, in his discretion, for the sole purpose of complying with the determination, refrain from enforcing the provision found by the department of housing and urban development to not meet the requirements of section 1508, P.L. 110-289, until the adjournment of the session of the legislature next following the determination by the department of housing and urban development.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-105, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2015, ch. 244, § 11, p. 1008.

§ 26-31-106. Funds collected under this chapter.

Except as provided in section 26-31-110[, Idaho Code,] of this chapter pertaining to the mortgage recovery fund, the director shall deposit all funds collected by the department under this chapter into the finance administrative account pursuant to section 67-2702, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-106, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-107. Charges for participation in the NMLSR.

Mortgage brokers, mortgage lenders and mortgage loan originators who seek to obtain or retain a license under this chapter shall pay the charges imposed and retained by the NMLSR to fund the expenses associated with an applicant’s or licensee’s participation in the NMLSR.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-107, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-108. Report to nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

The director shall regularly report to the NMLSR violations of this chapter, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, subject to the provisions of section 26-31-315, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-108, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-109. Mortgage recovery fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the mortgage recovery fund.

As provided in section 26-31-112, Idaho Code, the mortgage recovery fund shall be used to reimburse persons to whom an Idaho court awards actual damages resulting from acts constituting violations of this chapter by a mortgage broker, mortgage lender or mortgage loan originator who was licensed, or required to be licensed, under this chapter at the time that the act was committed.

A recovery from the mortgage recovery fund shall not include punitive damages awarded by a court.

Payments from the mortgage recovery fund may not be made to:

Any lender whose acts, or the acts of its agent, were found by a court to be violations of this chapter and a basis of the court’s award of a money judgment to a person injured by such violations;

Any person who acquires a mortgage loan where acts associated with the origination of such loan are found by a court to be violations of this chapter and a basis for a judgment obtained by a person injured by such violations; or

The spouse, the personal representative of the spouse of the judgment debtor or the personal representative of the judgment debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-109, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-110. Funding.

Upon application for a mortgage broker, mortgage lender or mortgage loan originator license, and upon renewal of such licenses issued under this chapter, the applicant or person seeking renewal shall, in addition to paying the license application or renewal fee required under this chapter, pay a fee to the department through the NMLSR for deposit in the mortgage recovery fund as follows:

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for home office locations of mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders licensed under part 2 of this chapter;

One hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each branch office location of a mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed under part 2 of this chapter; and

One hundred dollars ($100) for each mortgage loan originator licensed under part 3 of this chapter.

With respect to mortgage recovery fund fees payable at the time of annual license renewal for licensees under this chapter, the director may adjust the fees within the limits of subsection (1) of this section on a pro rata basis as necessary to maintain a balance of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in the mortgage recovery fund, plus an additional amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) as set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

All interest that accrues in the mortgage recovery fund shall be added to the balance of the mortgage recovery fund.

On an annual basis, the department may apply up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of moneys accumulated in the mortgage recovery fund in excess of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to:

Fund the department’s expenses in administering the mortgage recovery fund;

Develop and implement consumer education concerning the residential mortgage industry;

Contract for research projects for the state concerning the residential mortgage industry;

Fund the training expenses of department staff members and its attorneys concerning the residential mortgage industry; and

Publish and distribute educational materials to licensees and applicants for licensure under this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-110, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-111. Statute of limitations.

The filing of a verified claim with the court pursuant to section 26-31-112, Idaho Code, that is the basis of a claim against the mortgage recovery fund may not be instituted more than one (1) year after termination of all court proceedings concerning such judgment, including appeals.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-111, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-112. Procedure for recovery.

A person who obtains against a mortgage broker, mortgage lender or mortgage loan originator a money judgment in an Idaho court that includes findings of violations of this chapter occurring on or after July 1, 2009, after final judgment has been entered, execution returned unsatisfied and the judgment has been recorded, may file a verified claim with the court in which the judgment was entered, and on twenty (20) days’ written notice to the director and to the judgment debtor, may apply to the court for an order directing payment from the mortgage recovery fund of any unpaid amount on such judgment, subject to section 26-31-111, Idaho Code.

At a hearing on the application, the person seeking recovery from the mortgage recovery fund must show:

That the judgment has not been discharged in bankruptcy and is based on facts allowing recovery under section 26-31-109(2), Idaho Code;

That the person is not a spouse of the judgment debtor, or the personal representative of the spouse;

That the person is not a mortgage broker, mortgage lender or mortgage loan originator as defined by this chapter who is seeking to recover any compensation regarding the mortgage loan transaction which is the subject of the money judgment upon which a claim against the mortgage recovery fund is based; and

That, based on the best available information, the judgment debtor lacks sufficient nonexempt assets in this state or any other state to satisfy the judgment.

Any recovery on the money judgment received by the judgment creditor before payment from the mortgage recovery fund shall be applied by the judgment creditor to reduce the judgment creditor’s actual damages which were awarded in the judgment.

After giving notice and the opportunity for a hearing to the person seeking recovery, to the judgment debtor and to the department, the court may enter an order requiring the director to pay from the mortgage recovery fund the amount the court finds payable on the claim, pursuant to and in accordance with the limitations contained in this section, if the court is satisfied as to the proof of all matters required to be shown under subsection (2) of this section, and that the person seeking recovery from the mortgage recovery fund has satisfied all of the requirements of this section.

When the director receives notice that a hearing is scheduled under this section, the director may enter an appearance, file a response, appear at the hearing or take any other appropriate action as he deems necessary to protect the mortgage recovery fund from spurious or unjust claims and to ensure compliance with the requirements for recovery under this section.

If the court finds that the aggregate amount of claims against a mortgage broker, mortgage lender or mortgage loan originator exceeds the limits set forth in section 26-31-113, Idaho Code, the court shall reduce proportionately the amount the court finds payable on the claim.

The department shall provide the court with information concerning the mortgage recovery fund necessary to enable the court to carry out its duties under this section.
History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-112, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-113. Recovery limits.

A person entitled to receive payment from the mortgage recovery fund may receive reimbursement of actual damages, which shall not include post judgment interest, reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs as determined by the court, subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section and subject to the availability of sufficient funds in the mortgage recovery fund at the time payment is ordered.

A payment from the mortgage recovery fund may be made by the director only pursuant to a court order as provided by section 26-31-112, Idaho Code, in an amount equal to the unsatisfied portion of the creditor’s judgment or judgments or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever is less.

Payments from the mortgage recovery fund shall be limited in the aggregate to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) against any one (1) licensee. If the total claims against such licensee exceed the aggregate limit of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the court shall prorate payment based on the ratio that a person’s claim bears to the other claims filed against such licensee.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-113, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-114. Revocation of license for payment from mortgage recovery fund.

The director may summarily revoke a license issued under this chapter if the director is required by court order under section 26-31-112, Idaho Code, to make a payment from the mortgage recovery fund based on a money judgment that includes findings of violations of this chapter by such licensee.

A person whose license has been revoked under subsection (1) of this section is not eligible to be considered for the issuance of a new license under this chapter until the person has repaid in full, plus interest at the current legal rate, the amount paid from the mortgage recovery fund resulting from that person’s violation of this chapter.

This section does not limit the authority of the director to take disciplinary action against a licensee under this chapter for a violation of this chapter or of rules promulgated or orders issued pursuant to this chapter. The repayment in full to the mortgage recovery fund of all obligations of a licensee under this chapter does not nullify or modify the effect of any other disciplinary proceeding brought under this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-114, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.